Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-821
Sections; supplemental to other laws.

The provisions of sections 29-812 to 29-821 relating to the disposition of seized property shall not be exclusive, but shall be supplemental to other laws on the subject.

Laws 1963, c. 161, § 10, p. 575.